Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5058.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477A.35, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5b. new text end new text begin Penalties for moratoria on residential construction. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding anything in this section, the commissioner of revenue must not pay aid under this section to a city that imposes a moratorium on new residential developments. The commissioner of revenue must stop issuing payments to the city in the year after the city adopts a resolution or ordinance imposing the moratorium. The commissioner of revenue must issue payments to the city: (1) in the year after the moratorium expires; or (2) in the year after a resolution or ordinance to end the moratorium takes effect. During the period in which a city is not receiving aid pursuant to this subdivision, the commissioner of revenue must pay the amount that the city would have received under this section in the absence of this penalty to the county or counties containing the city. In the annual report required under subdivision 6, a tier I city must certify whether it has in effect a moratorium on new residential developments. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with aids payable in 2027. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477A.36, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5b. new text end new text begin Penalties for moratoria on residential construction. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding anything in this section, the commissioner of revenue must not pay aid under this section to a city that imposes a moratorium on new residential developments. The commissioner of revenue must stop issuing payments to the city in the year after the city adopts a resolution or ordinance imposing the moratorium. The commissioner of revenue must issue payments to the city: (1) in the year after the moratorium expires; or (2) in the year after a resolution or ordinance to end the moratorium takes effect. During the period in which a city is not receiving aid pursuant to this subdivision, the commissioner of revenue must pay the amount that the city would have received under this section in the absence of this penalty to the county or counties containing the city. In the annual report required under subdivision 6, a tier I city must certify whether it has in effect a moratorium on new residential developments. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with aids payable in 2027. new text end